Hawaii statutes.
§560:6-113 Financial institution
protection; set-off. Without qualifying any other statutory right to
set-off or lien and subject to any contractual provision, if a party to a
multiple-party account is indebted to a financial institution, the financial institution
has a right to set-off against the account in which the party has or had
immediately before the party's death a present right of withdrawal. The amount
of the account subject to set-off is the deceased party's net contribution to
the account, and in the absence of proof of net contributions, to an equal
share with all parties having present rights of withdrawal. [L 1976, c 200, pt
of §1; am L 1977, c 144, §52; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next